Illinois, session 104th, HB1932.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this amendatory Act of 5the 104th General Assembly is to address health care needs 6within the Department of Corrections by providing nursing 7scholarship assistance to eligible students in this State, 8subject to appropriation, and require a public service 9commitment agreement to work within the Department of 10Corrections for a specified duration. The Program shall be 11administered by the Illinois Student Assistance Commission 12with the guidance and assistance of the Department. 13    Section 10. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 14amended by adding Section 65.135 as follows: 15    (110 ILCS 947/65.135 new)16    Sec. 65.135. Nursing in correctional facilities 17scholarships.18    (a) In this Section:19    "Department" means the Department of Corrections.20    "Eligible institution" means a public community college, a 21private junior college, a hospital-based diploma in nursing 22program, or a public or private college or university with a   HB1932- 2 -LRB104 09448 LNS 19508 b1pre-licensure nursing education program located in this State 2that has received approval from the Department of Financial 3and Professional Regulation for an associate degree in nursing 4program, an associate degree in applied sciences in nursing 5program, a hospital-based diploma in nursing program, a 6baccalaureate degree in nursing program, a graduate degree in 7nursing program, or a certificate in a practical nursing 8program approved by the Board of Higher Education or any 9successor agency with similar authority. An eligible 10institution must maintain compliance with all applicable State 11and federal laws. An eligible institution is not necessarily 12eligible for other programs administered by the Commission and 13is not required to meet the definition of "institution of 14higher learning", "qualified institution", or "institution" 15under Section 10 of this Act. The Commission may establish by 16rule additional requirements for an eligible institution.17    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Commission shall award a 18nursing in correctional facilities scholarship to each 19qualified applicant. To determine the maximum annual 20scholarship amount available to a recipient enrolled full 21time, the Commission shall consider tuition and fee charges 22and projected living expenses at community colleges and 23universities statewide under the following criteria:24        (1) To determine the maximum scholarship amount for a 25    recipient pursuing a certificate in practical nursing at 26    an eligible institution, a hospital-based diploma in   HB1932- 3 -LRB104 09448 LNS 19508 b1    nursing, or an associate degree or diploma in nursing from 2    an community college, the Commission shall add the 3    weighted tuition and fees charged by community colleges in 4    this State to the uniform living allowance reported in the 5    weighted Monetary Award Program budget.6        (2) To determine the maximum scholarship amount for a 7    recipient pursuing an associate, baccalaureate, or 8    graduate degree in nursing at a private 2-year college or 9    a public or private 4-year eligible institution in this 10    State, the Commission shall add the weighted tuition and 11    fees charged by institutions of higher learning to the 12    uniform living allowance reported in the weighted Monetary 13    Award Program budget.14    The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by the 15Commission under this Section to an eligible applicant in any 16given fiscal year, when added to other financial assistance 17awarded to that individual for that year, may not exceed the 18cost of attendance at the institution at which the student is 19enrolled. If the amount of financial assistance to be awarded 20to a qualified student exceeds the cost of attendance at the 21institution at which the student is enrolled, the scholarship 22awarded under this Section shall be reduced by an amount equal 23to the amount by which the combined financial assistance 24available to the student exceeds the cost of attendance. 25    (c) The Commission shall, on an annual basis, receive and 26consider applications for scholarship assistance under this   HB1932- 4 -LRB104 09448 LNS 19508 b1Section. An applicant is eligible for a scholarship under this 2Section if the Commission finds that the applicant meets all 3of the following criteria:4        (1) Is a resident of this State.5        (2) Is enrolled in an eligible institution on at least 6    a part-time basis.7        (3) Expresses a commitment to work as a nurse within 8    the Department for a minimum of 3 years.9        (4) Is not receiving financial assistance during the 10    same academic year through a scholarship program under the 11    Nursing Education Scholarship Law.12    When selecting scholarship recipients from among eligible 13applicants, the Commission shall give preference first to 14previous recipients of a scholarship under this Section, 15provided that a recipient continues to meet the eligibility 16requirements set forth in this Section and maintains 17satisfactory academic progress as determined by the 18institution of higher education at which the recipient is 19enrolled. In considering new recipients, the Commission shall 20prioritize funding for students with financial need, as 21determined by the Commission.22    (d) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for an 23academic year, each recipient of a scholarship awarded under 24this Section must sign an agreement pledging that, within the 25one-year period following the termination of the academic 26program for which the recipient was awarded a scholarship, the   HB1932- 5 -LRB104 09448 LNS 19508 b1recipient shall:2        (1) begin working as a nurse within the Department for 3    a period of not less than 3 years; and4        (2) upon request of the Commission and subject to 5    confirmation with the Department, provide the Commission 6    with evidence that the recipient is fulfilling or has 7    fulfilled the terms of the agreement required under this 8    subsection (d).9    (e) A recipient may receive scholarship assistance under 10this Section for the equivalent of 8 semesters or 16 quarters 11of full-time enrollment.12    (f) All applications for a scholarship under this Section 13shall be made to the Commission in a form and manner prescribed 14by the Commission. An applicant shall also submit any 15supporting documents deemed necessary by the Commission at the 16time of application.17    (g) All scholarship funds distributed under this Section 18shall be paid to the eligible institution on behalf of the 19scholarship recipient.20    (h) If a recipient of a scholarship awarded under this 21Section fails to fulfill the agreement required under this 22Section, the Commission shall require the recipient to repay 23the amount of the scholarship or scholarships received, 24prorated according to the fraction of the agreement not 25completed, plus interest at a rate of 5% and, if applicable, 26reasonable collection fees. Payments received by the   HB1932- 6 -LRB104 09448 LNS 19508 b1Commission under this Section shall be remitted to the State 2Comptroller for deposit into the General Revenue Fund.3    (i) A recipient of a scholarship awarded by the Commission 4under this Section is not in violation of the agreement 5entered into pursuant to this Section if the recipient (i) is 6serving as a member of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 7the United States, (ii) has a temporary total disability, as 8established by a sworn affidavit of a qualified physician, 9(iii) is taking additional courses, on at least a half-time 10basis, related to nursing, or (iv) has extenuating and 11specific circumstances in which the recipient is unable to 12achieve full-time employment as a nurse within the Department 13and is able to provide evidence of that fact, subject to review 14by the Commission. Any extension of the period during which 15the agreement must be fulfilled is subject to limitations of 16duration established by the Commission, with the guidance and 17assistance of the Department.18    (j) In providing guidance and assistance to the 19Commission, the Department may collaborate with accredited 20State nursing schools to facilitate this Section. Eligible 21institutions are encouraged to support and promote this 22Section among their nursing students.23    (k) The Department, in consultation with the Commission, 24shall provide an annual report to the General Assembly on this 25Section's effectiveness, including the number of recipients, 26their service periods, and any challenges faced.  HB1932- 7 -LRB104 09448 LNS 19508 b1    (l) The funding for scholarships under this Section is 2subject to appropriation. Additional contributions from 3private entities, philanthropic organizations, or federal 4grants may supplement the scholarships.5    (m) The Commission shall administer this Section and shall 6make all necessary and proper rules not inconsistent with this 7Section for this Sections's effective implementation, with the 8guidance and assistance of the Department.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.